Hawaii statutes.
PART II.
GENERAL RELIEF

[§657D-11] Default judgments; affidavits;
bonds; attorneys for persons in service. (a) In a default of any
appearance by the defendant in any action or proceeding commenced in any court,
no judgment shall be entered without first securing a court order directing
that entry, and no order shall be made if the defendant is in the military
service until after the court has appointed an attorney to represent the
defendant. The court, on application, shall make such an appointment. If it
appears that the defendant is in the military service, the court may require
the plaintiff to file a bond approved by the court before judgment is entered.
The bond shall be to indemnify the defendant in military service against any
loss or damage that the defendant may suffer from any judgment should the
judgment be thereafter set aside in whole or in part. The court may make other
and further orders or enter a judgment that in its opinion may be necessary to
protect the rights of the defendant under this chapter.

(b) Any person who makes or uses any
affidavit, statement, declaration, verification, or certificate claiming that
the defendant is not in military service, knowing it to be false, shall be
punished as provided in chapter 710, part V.

(c) In any action or proceeding in which a
person in military service is a party and does not personally appear therein or
is not represented by an authorized attorney, the court may appoint an attorney
to represent the person. In that case, a bond may be required and an order
made to protect the rights of the person. But no attorney appointed under this
chapter to protect a person in military service shall have power to waive any
right of that person or bind that person.

(d) If any judgment shall be rendered in any
action or proceeding governed by this section against any person in military
service during the period of that service or within sixty days thereafter, and
it appears that the person in military service was prejudiced by reason of the
person's military service in making the person's defense thereto, then the
judgment, upon application made by the person or the person's legal
representative, not later than sixty days after the termination of the military
service, may be opened by the court rendering the same and the defendant or the
defendant's legal representative allowed to defend; provided it is made to
appear that the defendant has a meritorious or legal defense to the action or
some part thereof.

(e) Vacating, setting aside, or reversing any
judgment because of any of the provisions of this chapter shall not impair any
right or title acquired by any bona fide purchaser for value under the
judgment. [L 1994, c 257, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next